Oklahoma, session 2025, SB884.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-731.5 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This section shall be known and may be cited as the


“Oklahoma Right to Life Act”.


B. As used in this section:


1. “Abortion” means the use or prescription of any instrument,


medicine, drug, or any other substance or device intentionally to


terminate the pregnancy of a female known to be pregnant with an


intention other than to increase the probability of a live birth, to


preserve the life or health of the unborn person after live birth,

Req. No. 129 Page 1


or to remove a dead unborn person who died as the result of a


spontaneous miscarriage, accidental trauma, or a criminal assault on


the pregnant female or her unborn person; and


2. “Unborn person” means the unborn offspring of human beings


from the moment of conception, through pregnancy, and until live


birth including the human conceptus, zygote, morula, blastocyst,


embryo, and fetus.


C. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person


shall not purposely or recklessly perform, attempt to perform, or


aid or abet in any way the performance of an abortion.


2. When a medical condition arises that, in the reasonable


medical judgment of the attending health care provider, threatens


the life of a pregnant woman and necessitates delivery of the unborn


person, the health care provider shall deliver the unborn person and


shall make every reasonable effort, given the provider’s licensure,


capabilities, and training, to perform a live birth of the unborn


person, to preserve the life of the unborn person after birth, and


to preserve the life of the pregnant woman.


3. If the health care provider makes every such reasonable


effort, he or she shall not be:


a. subject to prosecution for the death of the unborn


person or pregnant woman including, but not limited


to, prosecution under subsection D of this section,


and

Req. No. 129 Page 2


b. liable for any civil damages as a result of any acts


or omissions by such health care provider except for


committing gross negligence or willful wanton wrongs


in the rendering of medical care.


D. 1. Any person found in violation of subsection C of this


section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of murder in the first


degree punishable as provided in Section 701.9 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


2. This section does not prohibit the sale, use, prescription,


or administration of a contraceptive measure, drug, or chemical if


the contraceptive measure, drug, or chemical is administered before


the time when a pregnancy could be determined through conventional


medical testing and if the contraceptive measure, drug, or chemical


is sold, used, prescribed, or administered in accordance with


manufacturer instructions.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-129 DC 1/19/2025 5:45:14 AM







Req. No. 129 Page 3